src/nouns/nouns-masc.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +Nom +Mas +Sg +Pl

LEXICON Root
Noun;

LEXICON Noun
Masculine;

LEXICON MascNomInf
+Nom+Mas+Sg:0   #;
+Nom+Mas+Pl:^s  #;

LEXICON Masculine
Abbevillois	MascNomInf;
ablégat	MascNomInf;
aboutissement	MascNomInf;
abstractionnisme	MascNomInf;
accomplissement	MascNomInf;
acétalisation	MascNomInf;
acritarche	MascNomInf;
adessif	MascNomInf;
Ægyptien	MascNomInf;
affairisme	MascNomInf;
agencement	MascNomInf;
ahanement	MascNomInf;
aître	MascNomInf;
alchimiste	MascNomInf;
alkoxyde	MascNomInf;
alourdissement	MascNomInf;
amaretto	MascNomInf;
amidonnier	MascNomInf;
ampli	MascNomInf;
Andalou	MascNomInf;
anglophone	MascNomInf;
anomère	MascNomInf;
anticonformisme	MascNomInf;
antiradicalaire	MascNomInf;
apéro	MascNomInf;
appétit	MascNomInf;
arabe	MascNomInf;
archaïsme	MascNomInf;
argyrisme	MascNomInf;
arrière-grand-père	MascNomInf;
artichaut	MascNomInf;
assaisonnement	MascNomInf;
astigmatisme	MascNomInf;
attaquant	MascNomInf;
aulacode	MascNomInf;
automobiliste	MascNomInf;
avertissement	MascNomInf;
Aymara	MascNomInf;
babiroussa	MascNomInf;
bagnard	MascNomInf;
balayage	MascNomInf;
bambocheur	MascNomInf;
barbe	MascNomInf;
baryton	MascNomInf;
Batave	MascNomInf;
bavolet	MascNomInf;
béhaviorisme	MascNomInf;
benzodiazépine	MascNomInf;
beuglement	MascNomInf;
bienfait	MascNomInf;
binocle	MascNomInf;
bipeur	MascNomInf;
blagueur	MascNomInf;
blond	MascNomInf;
bois	MascNomInf;
bonsaï	MascNomInf;
bou	MascNomInf;
bouldozeur	MascNomInf;
bousard	MascNomInf;
braîment	MascNomInf;
Breton	MascNomInf;
brochet	MascNomInf;
brûlot	MascNomInf;
buron	MascNomInf;
bécarre	MascNomInf;
cache-cache	MascNomInf;
caféier	MascNomInf;
calaisien	MascNomInf;
calomniateur	MascNomInf;
campanologue	MascNomInf;
caniveau	MascNomInf;
capital	MascNomInf;
carambolage	MascNomInf;
caribou	MascNomInf;
Carthaginois	MascNomInf;
castillan	MascNomInf;
cation	MascNomInf;
célibataire	MascNomInf;
cep	MascNomInf;
cétane	MascNomInf;
chambard	MascNomInf;
chantefable	MascNomInf;
charisme	MascNomInf;
chatteur	MascNomInf;
chêne	MascNomInf;
chez-soi	MascNomInf;
chironome	MascNomInf;
choriste	MascNomInf;
chtimi	MascNomInf;
cinéaste	MascNomInf;
cistre	MascNomInf;
claveciniste	MascNomInf;
cloistre	MascNomInf;
cockpit	MascNomInf;
cognement	MascNomInf;
collectivisme	MascNomInf;
colosse	MascNomInf;
commodore	MascNomInf;
compost	MascNomInf;
concussionnaire	MascNomInf;
Congolais	MascNomInf;
constitutionnalisme	MascNomInf;
contre-révolutionnaire	MascNomInf;
coopérite	MascNomInf;
corbillard	MascNomInf;
corridor	MascNomInf;
cotillon	MascNomInf;
coupé-cabriolet	MascNomInf;
coutelier	MascNomInf;
craquement	MascNomInf;
creuset	MascNomInf;
croiseur	MascNomInf;
crustacé	MascNomInf;
cultivateur	MascNomInf;
cuvier	MascNomInf;
cyclostome	MascNomInf;
dæmon	MascNomInf;
das	MascNomInf;
débourbage	MascNomInf;
déchiffrage	MascNomInf;
découplage	MascNomInf;
déformateur	MascNomInf;
délabrement	MascNomInf;
demeurant	MascNomInf;
dentifrice	MascNomInf;
dérangement	MascNomInf;
déséquilibré	MascNomInf;
destinataire	MascNomInf;
deuxième	MascNomInf;
diagramme	MascNomInf;
didacticiel	MascNomInf;
Dijonnais	MascNomInf;
dioxyde	MascNomInf;
disjoncteur	MascNomInf;
dixième	MascNomInf;
dogme	MascNomInf;
dormeur	MascNomInf;
dramaturge	MascNomInf;
duel	MascNomInf;
dysprosium	MascNomInf;
éblouissement	MascNomInf;
écheveau	MascNomInf;
écotone	MascNomInf;
éditeur	MascNomInf;
égouttoir	MascNomInf;
électroencéphalogramme	MascNomInf;
émargement	MascNomInf;
émétique	MascNomInf;
empirique	MascNomInf;
encaisseur	MascNomInf;
encrine	MascNomInf;
endroit	MascNomInf;
engraissement	MascNomInf;
enrochement	MascNomInf;
entier	MascNomInf;
envahisseur	MascNomInf;
éperlan	MascNomInf;
épistolaire	MascNomInf;
équipier	MascNomInf;
escamotage	MascNomInf;
espiègle	MascNomInf;
estoc	MascNomInf;
étatisme	MascNomInf;
éthylidène	MascNomInf;
eugénisme	MascNomInf;
exagérateur	MascNomInf;
exo	MascNomInf;
exterminateur	MascNomInf;
faict	MascNomInf;
farceur	MascNomInf;
faux-filet	MascNomInf;
fer-blanc	MascNomInf;
fétichisme	MascNomInf;
fifre	MascNomInf;
finnois	MascNomInf;
flash-ball	MascNomInf;
flot	MascNomInf;
fonceur	MascNomInf;
formalisme	MascNomInf;
fourré	MascNomInf;
franchisage	MascNomInf;
frère	MascNomInf;
front	MascNomInf;
furanéol	MascNomInf;
gagne-pain	MascNomInf;
gamète	MascNomInf;
gargouillement	MascNomInf;
gazage	MascNomInf;
génitif	MascNomInf;
géotechnicien	MascNomInf;
gigantisme	MascNomInf;
glaucome	MascNomInf;
glyphe	MascNomInf;
gonze	MascNomInf;
gourdin	MascNomInf;
grand-duc	MascNomInf;
gredin	MascNomInf;
grille-pain	MascNomInf;
Guatémaltèque	MascNomInf;
guitariste	MascNomInf;
haïku	MascNomInf;
hameçon	MascNomInf;
harnais	MascNomInf;
heaume	MascNomInf;
hémérythrine	MascNomInf;
hérétique	MascNomInf;
hexadécimal	MascNomInf;
hispanophone	MascNomInf;
homo	MascNomInf;
horsain	MascNomInf;
humanitaire	MascNomInf;
hydrolaccolithe	MascNomInf;
hypnotiseur	MascNomInf;
idéogramme	MascNomInf;
iminoacide	MascNomInf;
impressionniste	MascNomInf;
indic	MascNomInf;
infortuné	MascNomInf;
instructeur	MascNomInf;
intermède	MascNomInf;
invité	MascNomInf;
isobornéol	MascNomInf;
jacassage	MascNomInf;
jars	MascNomInf;
jeudi	MascNomInf;
jour-homme	MascNomInf;
juriste	MascNomInf;
kayak	MascNomInf;
kiki	MascNomInf;
kouglof	MascNomInf;
lactobacille	MascNomInf;
lamier	MascNomInf;
larcin	MascNomInf;
lazzi	MascNomInf;
léopard	MascNomInf;
lexicomane	MascNomInf;
lien	MascNomInf;
linge	MascNomInf;
littoral	MascNomInf;
lombard	MascNomInf;
loyalisme	MascNomInf;
lymphocyte	MascNomInf;
maclage	MascNomInf;
magnésium	MascNomInf;
maitre	MascNomInf;
maliciel	MascNomInf;
mandchou	MascNomInf;
mannequinat	MascNomInf;
marasme	MascNomInf;
marinier	MascNomInf;
marteleur	MascNomInf;
mastère	MascNomInf;
maxillaire	MascNomInf;
médium	MascNomInf;
melchior	MascNomInf;
mentor	MascNomInf;
mésityle	MascNomInf;
météorologiste	MascNomInf;
métrologue	MascNomInf;
microfossile	MascNomInf;
milk-shake	MascNomInf;
minimum	MascNomInf;
mitraillage	MascNomInf;
moisi	MascNomInf;
monétariste	MascNomInf;
monorail	MascNomInf;
moratoire	MascNomInf;
motoriste	MascNomInf;
muffin	MascNomInf;
murex	MascNomInf;
mythomane	MascNomInf;
nanokatal	MascNomInf;
naturopathe	MascNomInf;
nègre	MascNomInf;
néral	MascNomInf;
nibard	MascNomInf;
nô	MascNomInf;
nonagénaire	MascNomInf;
nous	MascNomInf;
nutritionniste	MascNomInf;
occultisme	MascNomInf;
œconomiste	MascNomInf;
offreur	MascNomInf;
olympe	MascNomInf;
opiacé	MascNomInf;
ordinateur	MascNomInf;
ornithologue	MascNomInf;
ostéoïde	MascNomInf;
outil	MascNomInf;
oxychlorure	MascNomInf;
pailler	MascNomInf;
Palois	MascNomInf;
panonceau	MascNomInf;
paquet	MascNomInf;
parangon	MascNomInf;
pariage	MascNomInf;
particulier	MascNomInf;
pathologiste	MascNomInf;
pavillon	MascNomInf;
pédé	MascNomInf;
pendule	MascNomInf;
péplum	MascNomInf;
périnée	MascNomInf;
personnage	MascNomInf;
pétrel	MascNomInf;
phénalène	MascNomInf;
physiocrate	MascNomInf;
picolo	MascNomInf;
pilonnage	MascNomInf;
plaçage	MascNomInf;
plein-emploi	MascNomInf;
poing	MascNomInf;
polymorphisme	MascNomInf;
porte-jarretelles	MascNomInf;
poujadiste	MascNomInf;
précepteur	MascNomInf;
prétexte	MascNomInf;
prolatif	MascNomInf;
prud'homme	MascNomInf;
purgatoire	MascNomInf;
quarré	MascNomInf;
rabbin	MascNomInf;
radja	MascNomInf;
rappeur	MascNomInf;
rébus	MascNomInf;
rééquilibrage	MascNomInf;
remake	MascNomInf;
repère	MascNomInf;
résumé	MascNomInf;
rhinopithèque	MascNomInf;
rodéo	MascNomInf;
roulage	MascNomInf;
sable	MascNomInf;
salpêtre	MascNomInf;
saule	MascNomInf;
scion	MascNomInf;
séléniure	MascNomInf;
serpolet	MascNomInf;
SIDA	MascNomInf;
sit-in	MascNomInf;
soda	MascNomInf;
sorgho	MascNomInf;
sous-comité	MascNomInf;
splendeur	MascNomInf;
stérol	MascNomInf;
suboxyde	MascNomInf;
superamas	MascNomInf;
surplace	MascNomInf;
tabarnac	MascNomInf;
tambourinaire	MascNomInf;
taux	MascNomInf;
téléski	MascNomInf;
terre-neuve	MascNomInf;
teufeur	MascNomInf;
théosophe	MascNomInf;
toit	MascNomInf;
Tourangeau	MascNomInf;
transfo	MascNomInf;
tréteau	MascNomInf;
trioxygène	MascNomInf;
trucmuche	MascNomInf;
tzar	MascNomInf;
uræus	MascNomInf;
varan	MascNomInf;
vergne	MascNomInf;
vide-grenier	MascNomInf;
virus	MascNomInf;
volume	MascNomInf;
webmestre	MascNomInf;
yoghourt	MascNomInf;
zombi	MascNomInf;
équipementier	MascNomInf;
